Indiana, session 2026, HB1290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-2-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter:
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor or the
commissioner's authorized representative.
"Department" means the department of labor.
"Occupation" means an industry, trade, business, or class of work
in which employees are gainfully employed.
"Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, limited
liability company, corporation, business trust, the state, or other
governmental agency or political subdivision during any work week in
which they have two (2) or more employees. However, it shall not
include any employer who is subject to the minimum wage provisions
of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended (29 U.S.C.
201-219).
"Employee" means any person employed or permitted to work or
perform any service for remuneration or under any contract of hire,
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


written or oral, express or implied by an employer in any occupation in
this state, but shall not include any of the following:
(a) Persons less than sixteen (16) years of age.
(b) Persons engaged in an independently established trade,
occupation, profession, or business who, in performing the
services in question, are free from control or direction both under
a contract of service and in fact.
(c) Persons performing services not in the course of the
employing unit's trade or business.
(d) Persons employed on a commission basis.
(e) Persons employed by their own parent, spouse, or child.
(f) Members of any religious order performing any service for that
order, any ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister, priest,
rabbi, sexton, or Christian Science reader, and volunteers
performing services for any religious or charitable organization.
(g) Persons performing services as student nurses in the employ
of a hospital or nurses training school while enrolled and
regularly attending classes in a nurses training school chartered
or approved under law, or students performing services in the
employ of persons licensed as both funeral directors and
embalmers as a part of their requirements for apprenticeship to
secure an embalmer's license or a funeral director's license from
the state, or during their attendance at any schools required by law
for securing an embalmer's or funeral director's license.
(h) Persons who have completed a four (4) year course in a
medical school approved by law when employed as interns or
resident physicians by any accredited hospital.
(i) Students performing services for any school, college, or
university in which they are enrolled and are regularly attending
classes.
(j) Persons with physical or mental disabilities performing
services for nonprofit organizations organized primarily for the
purpose of providing employment for persons with disabilities or
for assisting in their therapy and rehabilitation.
(k) Persons employed as insurance producers, insurance
solicitors, and outside salesmen, if all their services are performed
for remuneration solely by commission.
(l) Persons performing services for any camping, recreational, or
guidance facilities operated by a charitable, religious, or
educational nonprofit organization.
(m) Persons engaged in agricultural labor. The term shall include
only services performed:
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


(1) on a farm, in connection with cultivating the soil, or in
connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural or
horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing,
feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock,
bees, poultry, and furbearing animals and wildlife;
(2) in the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a
farm, in connection with the operation, management,
conservation, improvement, or maintenance of the farm and its
tools and equipment if the major part of the service is
performed on a farm;
(3) in connection with:
(A) the production or harvesting of maple sugar or maple
syrup or any commodity defined as an agricultural
commodity in the Agricultural Marketing Act, as amended
(12 U.S.C. 1141j);
(B) the raising or harvesting of mushrooms;
(C) the hatching of poultry; or
(D) the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals,
reservoirs, or waterways used exclusively for supplying and
storing water for farming purposes; and
(4) in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging,
processing, freezing, grading, storing, or delivering to storage,
to market, or to a carrier for transportation to market, any
agricultural or horticultural commodity, but only if service is
performed as an incident to ordinary farming operation or, in
the case of fruits and vegetables, as an incident to the
preparation of fruits and vegetables for market. However, this
exception shall not apply to services performed in connection
with any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its
delivery to a terminal market or processor for preparation or
distribution for consumption.
As used in this subdivision, "farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry,
fruit, furbearing animals, and truck farms, nurseries, orchards, or
greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the
raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities.
(n) Those persons employed in executive, administrative, or
professional occupations who have the authority to employ or
discharge and who earn one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more
a week, and outside salesmen.
(o) Any person not employed for more than four (4) weeks in any
four (4) consecutive three (3) month periods.
(p) Any employee with respect to whom the Interstate Commerce
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


Commission United States Secretary of Transportation has
power to establish qualifications and maximum hours of service
under the federal Motor Carrier Act of 1935 (49 U.S.C. 304(3))
49 U.S.C. 31502 or any employee of a carrier subject to IC 8-2.1.
(q) A person engaged in services as a direct seller. The term shall
include only services performed:
(1) by a person that is in the trade or business of:
(A) selling, or soliciting the sale of, consumer products or
services to any buyer on a buy-sell basis,
deposit-commission basis, or similar basis, in any place
other than in a permanent retail establishment; or
(B) selling, or soliciting the sale of, consumer products or
services in any place other than in a permanent retail
establishment;
(2) when substantially all the remuneration, whether or not
paid in cash, for the performance of the services is directly
related to sales or other output, including the performance of
services, rather than the number of hours worked; and
(3) when the services performed by the person are performed
pursuant to a written contract and the contract provides that
the person who performs the services will not be treated as an
employee for tax purposes under the contract.
(r) A person who:
(1) has entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor
league level; and
(2) is compensated under the terms of a collective bargaining
agreement that expressly provides for wages and working
conditions.
SECTION 2. IC 22-2-2-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Any employer who violates
the provisions of section 4 of this chapter concerning the payment of
minimum wages shall be liable to the employee. or employees affected
in the amount of their unpaid minimum wages and in an equal
additional amount as liquidated damages.
(b) An action to recover such liability under this section may must
be maintained:
(1) within:
(A) three (3) years after the cause of action therefor arises if
the violation is willful; or
(B) two (2) years after the cause of action arises if clause
(A) is inapplicable; and
(2) in the circuit or superior court of the county in which the
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


services out of which the claim arises were performed or in which
the defendant resides or transacts business.
(c) An Such action under this section may be brought by any one
(1) or more employees for and on behalf of himself the employee or
themselves the employee and all other employees of the same
employer who are similarly situated. No employee shall be a party
plaintiff to any such action under this section unless he the employee
gives his the employee's consent in writing to become such a party and
such the consent is filed in the court in which such action is brought.
(d) The court in such action shall, in addition to any judgment
awarded to the plaintiffs, allow recovery of An employee may recover
the following in an action under this section:
(1) Any unpaid minimum wages.
(2) Liquidated damages equal to the amount described in
subdivision (1).
(3) A reasonable attorney's fee. and
(4) The costs of the action.
(e) No contract or agreement between the employee and the
employer nor any acceptance of a lesser wage by the employee shall be
a defense to the action. It is not a defense in an action under this
chapter that:
(1) a contract or agreement between the employee and the
employer provided for or allowed the violation; or
(2) the employee accepted a lesser wage.
SECTION 3. IC 22-2-4-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. It is a Class C infraction for a
person to knowingly sell to his the person's employee any merchandise
or supplies at a higher price than the merchandise or supplies are sold
to others for cash. market price.
SECTION 4. IC 22-2-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.51-2007,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Every person, firm, corporation, limited
liability company, or association, their trustees, lessees, or receivers
appointed by any court, doing business in Indiana, shall pay each
employee at least semimonthly or biweekly if requested, the amount
due the employee. The payment shall be made in lawful money of the
United States, by negotiable check, draft, or money order, or by
electronic transfer to the financial institution designated by the
employee. Any contract in violation of this subsection is void.
(b) Payment shall be made for all wages earned to a date not more
than ten (10) business days prior to the date of payment. However, this
subsection does not prevent payments being made at shorter intervals
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


than specified in this subsection, nor repeal any law providing for
payments at shorter intervals. However, if an employee voluntarily
leaves employment, either permanently or temporarily, the employer
shall not be required to pay the employee an amount due the employee
until the next usual and regular day for payment of wages, as
established by the employer. If an employee leaves employment
voluntarily, and without the employee's whereabouts or address being
known to the employer, the employer is not subject to section 2 of this
chapter until:
(1) ten (10) business days have elapsed after the employee has
made a demand for the wages due the employee; or
(2) the employee has furnished the employer with the employee's
address where the wages may be sent or forwarded.
SECTION 5. IC 22-2-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Every such A person, firm, corporation,
limited liability company, or association who shall fail fails to make
payment of wages to any such an employee as provided in section 1 of
this chapter shall be liable to the employee. for the amount of unpaid
wages,
(b) and the amount may be recovered An action to recover under
this section may be filed in any court having jurisdiction of a suit to
recover with respect to the amount due to the employee. The court
shall order as costs in the case a reasonable fee for the plaintiff's
attorney and court costs. In addition, if the court in any such suit
determines that the person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
or association that failed to pay the employee as provided in section 1
of this chapter was not acting in good faith, the court shall order, as
liquidated damages for the failure to pay wages, that the employee be
paid an amount equal to two (2) times the amount of wages due the
employee.
(c) An action to recover under this section must be maintained
within:
(1) three (3) years after the cause of action arises if the
violation is willful; or
(2) two (2) years after the cause of action arises if subdivision
(1) is inapplicable.
(d) An employee may recover the following in an action under
this section:
(1) Any unpaid minimum wages.
(2) Liquidated damages equal to two (2) times the unpaid
wages, if the court finds that the failure to pay the employee
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


was the result of bad faith.
(3) A reasonable attorney's fee.
(4) The court costs.
SECTION 6. IC 22-2-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.147-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Any assignment of the wages of an
employee is valid only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The assignment is:
(A) in writing;
(B) signed by the employee personally;
(C) for assignments executed before July 1, 2026, by its
terms revocable at any time by the employee upon written
notice to the employer; and
(D) agreed to in writing by the employer.
(2) An executed copy of the assignment is delivered to the
employer within ten (10) days after its execution.
(3) The assignment is made for a purpose described in subsection
(b).
(b) A wage assignment under this section may be made for the
purpose of paying any of the following:
(1) Premium on a policy of insurance obtained for the employee
by the employer.
(2) Pledge or contribution of the employee to a charitable or
nonprofit organization.
(3) Purchase price of bonds or securities, issued or guaranteed by
the United States.
(4) Purchase price of shares of stock, or fractional interests in
shares of stock, of the employing company, or of a company
owning the majority of the issued and outstanding stock of the
employing company, whether purchased from such company, in
the open market or otherwise. However, if such shares are to be
purchased on installments pursuant to a written purchase
agreement, the employee has the right under the purchase
agreement at any time before completing purchase of such shares
to cancel said agreement and to have repaid promptly the amount
of all installment payments which theretofore have been made.
(5) Dues to become owing by the employee to a labor
organization of which the employee is a member.
(6) Purchase price of merchandise, goods, or food offered by the
employer and sold to the employee, for the employee's benefit,
use, or consumption, at the written request of the employee. A
valid assignment under this subdivision may also benefit the
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


employer.
(7) Amount of a loan made to the employee by the employer and
evidenced by a written instrument executed by the employee
subject to the amount limits set forth in section 4(c) of this
chapter.
(8) Contributions, assessments, or dues of the employee to a
hospital service or a surgical or medical expense plan or to an
employees' association, trust, or plan existing for the purpose of
paying pensions or other benefits to said employee or to others
designated by the employee.
(9) Payment to any credit union, nonprofit organizations, or
associations of employees of such employer organized under any
law of this state or of the United States.
(10) Payment to any person or organization regulated under the
Uniform Consumer Credit Code (IC 24-4.5) for deposit or credit
to the employee's account by electronic transfer or as otherwise
designated by the employee.
(11) Premiums on policies of insurance and annuities purchased
by the employee on the employee's life.
(12) The purchase price of shares or fractional interest in shares
in one (1) or more mutual funds.
(13) A judgment owed by the employee if the payment:
(A) is made in accordance with an agreement between the
employee and the creditor; and
(B) is not a garnishment under IC 34-25-3.
(14) The purchase, rental, or use of uniforms, shirts, pants, or
other job-related job related clothing at an amount not to exceed
the direct cost paid by an employer to an external vendor for those
items.
(15) The purchase of equipment or tools necessary to fulfill the
duties of employment at an amount not to exceed the direct cost
paid by an employer to an external vendor for those items.
(16) Reimbursement for education or employee skills training.
However, a wage assignment may not be made if the education or
employee skills training benefits were provided, in whole or in
part, through an economic development incentive from any
federal, state, or local program.
(17) An advance for:
(A) payroll; or
(B) vacation;
pay.
(18) The employee's drug education and addiction treatment
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


services under IC 12-23-23.
(c) The interest rate charged on amounts loaned or advanced to an
employee and repaid under subsection (b) may not exceed the bank
prime loan interest rate as reported by the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System or any successor rate, plus four percent (4%).
(d) The total amount of wages subject to assignment under
subsection (b)(14) and (b)(15) may not exceed the lesser of:
(1) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year; or
(2) five percent (5%) of the employee's weekly disposable
earnings (as defined in IC 24-4.5-5-105(1)(a)).
(e) Except as provided under 29 CFR Parts 1910, 1915, 1917, 1918,
and 1926, an employee shall not be charged or subject to a wage
assignment under subsection (b)(14) or (b)(15) for protective
equipment including personal protective equipment identified under 29
CFR Parts 1910, 1915, 1917, 1918, and 1926.
SECTION 7. IC 22-2-6-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. An employee may bring an action under IC 22-2-2,
IC 22-2-5, or IC 22-2-9, as applicable, if an employer deducts an
improper amount of wages under this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 22-2-9-0.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 361, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.1. (a) The amendments made to
section 5 of this chapter by P.L.165-2007 apply to wage claims filed
with the commissioner of labor after June 30, 2007.
(b) If an employer separates an employee from the payroll, all
claims that would otherwise arise under IC 22-2-5 must be brought
in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 22-2-9-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Whenever any employer
separates any employee from the pay-roll, payroll, the unpaid wages
or compensation of such the employee, including all wages or
compensation that may have been due at any time during the
employment relationship, shall become due and payable at the
regular pay day for the pay period in which separation occurred.
Provided, However, that this provision shall not apply to railroads in
the payment by them to their employees.
(b) In the event of the suspension of work, as the result of an
industrial dispute, the wages and compensation earned and unpaid at
the time of such suspension shall become due and payable at the next
regular pay day, including, without abatement or reduction, all amounts
due all persons whose work has been suspended as a result of such
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


industrial dispute.
SECTION 10. IC 22-2-9-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) It shall be the
duty of the commissioner of labor to enforce and to insure compliance
with the provisions of this chapter, to investigate any violations of any
of the provisions of this chapter, and to institute or cause to be
instituted actions for penalties and forfeitures provided under this
chapter. The commissioner of labor may hold hearings to satisfy
himself as to the justice of any claim, and he shall cooperate with any
employee in the enforcement of any claim against his employer in any
case whenever, in his opinion, the claim is just and valid.
(b) The commissioner of labor may refer claims for wages under
this chapter to the attorney general, and the attorney general may
initiate civil actions on behalf of the claimant or may refer the claim to
any attorney admitted to the practice of law in Indiana. The provisions
of IC 22-2-5-2 apply to civil actions initiated under this subsection by
the attorney general or his designee.
(a) The commissioner of labor has the following duties under
this chapter:
(1) To enforce and to ensure compliance with the provisions
of this chapter.
(2) To investigate any violations of any of the provisions of
this chapter.
(3) To institute or cause to be instituted actions for penalties
and forfeitures provided under this chapter.
(b) In discharging the duties described in subsection (a), the
commissioner of labor:
(1) may hold hearings to evaluate the merits of a claim; and
(2) shall cooperate with any employee in the enforcement of
a claim against an employer.
(c) A person may file a civil action to recover wages due under
section 2 of this chapter only if:
(1) the person:
(A) files a litigation notice with the department of labor;
and
(B) serves the litigation notice to the employer alleged to be
in violation of this chapter by certified mail;
(2) the department:
(A) authorizes the person to proceed with a civil action; or
(B) fails to respond to the litigation notice within sixty (60)
days; and
(3) no action has been initiated pursuant to section 5 of this
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153


chapter with respect to the wages.
(d) A litigation notice described in subsection (c) must include
the following:
(1) The identity of the employer alleged to be in violation of
this chapter.
(2) The factual basis for the notice.
(e) The provisions of IC 22-2-5-2 apply to civil actions initiated
under subsection (c), including the statute of limitations provided
therein.
SECTION 11. IC 34-11-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Except as provided
in IC 22-2, an action relating to the terms, conditions, and privileges
of employment except actions based upon a written contract (including,
but not limited to, hiring or the failure to hire, suspension, discharge,
discipline, promotion, demotion, retirement, wages, or salary) must be
brought within two (2) years of the date of the act or omission
complained of.
2026 IN 1290—LS 6887/DI 153